Utah statutes.
34-20a-5.   Corporate authority duty -- Collective bargaining agreement -- No-strike clause.

It is the duty of any corporate authority to meet and collectively bargain in good faith with the bargaining representative within 10 days after receipt of written notice from such representative that it represents a majority of the employees in the bargaining unit. No collective bargaining agreement shall be executed for a period of more than two years. Each bargaining agreement shall contain a no-strike clause.



Enacted by Chapter 102, 1975 General Session

